Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 3
ANNUAL LEVY - INCREASE OR REDUCTION - LIMITATION

Cross references:

For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

29-1-301. Levies reduced - limitation.

All statutory tax levies for collection in 1989 and thereafter when applied to the total valuation for assessment of the state, each of the counties, cities, and towns not chartered as home rule except as provided in this subsection (1), and each of the fire, sanitation, irrigation, drainage, conservancy, and other special districts established by law shall be so reduced as to prohibit the levying of a greater amount of revenue than was levied in the preceding year plus five and one-half percent plus the amount of revenue abated or refunded by the taxing entity by August 1 of the current year less the amount of revenue received by the taxing entity by August 1 of the current year as taxes paid on any taxable property that had previously been omitted from the assessment roll of any year, except to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon, for the payment of any contractual obligation that has been approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the taxing entity, for the payment of expenses incurred in the reappraisal of classes or subclasses ordered by or conducted by the state board of equalization, for the payment to the state of excess state equalization payments to school districts which excess is due to the undervaluation of taxable property, or for the payment of capital expenditures as provided in subsection (1.2) of this section. For purposes of this subsection (1), the amount of revenues received as taxes paid on any taxable property that had been previously omitted from the assessment roll shall not include the amount of such revenues received as taxes paid on oil and gas leaseholds and lands that had been previously omitted from the assessment roll due to underreporting of the selling price or the quantity of oil or gas sold therefrom. In computing the limit, the following shall be excluded: The increased valuation for assessment attributable to annexation or inclusion of additional land, the improvements thereon, and personal property connected therewith within the taxing entity for the preceding year; the increased valuation for assessment attributable to new construction and personal property connected therewith, as defined by the property tax administrator in manuals prepared pursuant to section 39-2-109 (1)(e), C.R.S., within the taxing entity for the preceding year; the increased valuation for assessment attributable to increased volume of production for the preceding year by a producing mine if said mine is wholly or partially within the taxing entity and if said increase in volume of production causes an increase in the level of services provided by the taxing entity; and the increased valuation for assessment attributable to previously legally exempt federal property which becomes taxable if such property causes an increase in the level of services provided by the taxing entity.

For property tax years beginning on or after January 1, 1991, any taxing entity may apply to the division of local government in the department of local affairs for authorization to exclude the following from the computation of the limitation set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1): All or any portion of the increased valuation for assessment attributable to new primary oil or gas production for the preceding year from any producing oil and gas leasehold or land if such oil and gas leasehold or land is wholly or partially within the taxing entity and if such new primary oil or gas production has caused or will cause an increase in the level of services provided by the taxing entity.

Any application submitted by a taxing entity pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall contain the following information:

An explanation of the causal relationship between the new primary oil or gas production specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) and the increase in the level of services provided or to be provided by the taxing entity;

The statutory mill levy and estimated amount of revenue that the taxing entity would collect if said exclusion is authorized;

The statutory mill levy and estimated amount of revenue that the taxing entity would collect if said exclusion is not authorized;

The nature and amount of the expenditures which would be made from any increased amount of revenues collected if said exclusion is authorized.

Upon receipt of an application which complies with the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), the division of local government may grant or deny authority to the taxing entity to exclude all or any portion of such increased valuation for assessment specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1). Any authorization granted pursuant to this paragraph (d) shall specify the amount of such valuation for assessment which may be excluded. If said exclusion is authorized by said division, the taxing entity shall deposit any increased amount of revenues collected as a result of said exclusion into a fund created by the taxing entity which shall consist solely of such revenues. Moneys in such fund shall be used exclusively for any increase in the level of services provided by the taxing entity which occurs as a result of the new primary oil or gas production specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1).

Upon receipt of an application which complies with the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), the division of local government shall provide a copy of such application to the oil and gas operators of record wherein the taxing jurisdiction the increased valuation from new primary oil and gas production has occurred.

Standing to challenge any determination made by the division of local government pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be limited to the owners of taxable property located wholly or partially within the taxing entity on the date the taxing entity is granted or denied authorization to make an exclusion pursuant to this subsection (1).

(1.2) (a) The limitation provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply for the purpose of raising revenue to pay for capital expenditures. Such revenue shall not be included in determining the limitation in following years. For the purposes of this paragraph (a), "capital expenditure" means an expenditure made by a taxing entity for long-term additions or betterments, which expenditure, under generally accepted accounting principles, is not properly chargeable as an expense of operation and maintenance. This paragraph (a) shall apply to counties, cities, and towns.

If a county imposes an increased mill levy pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.2) for a one-time, nonrecurring expenditure for a county road or bridge capital project or county road or bridge capital asset, the county may also request that the division of local government waive application of the provisions of section 43-2-202 (2), C.R.S., to the revenue received from that increased levy. In that event, said division shall notify the governing body of each municipality in the county of the request and of the period of time, not less than twenty days, during which the division will receive comment on the request. In considering whether to waive application of said section 43-2-202 (2), C.R.S., the division shall consider, among other relevant matters, the benefit of the project or asset to the municipalities in the county, the need for the project or asset, and alternative methods of and timing for financing the project or asset. No approval for such waiver shall be granted or continued until the division determines that the property tax revenues in the road and bridge fund, excluding the revenues from such increased levy, for the year for which the increase is imposed bear at least the same proportion to all countywide property tax revenues as in the immediate prior year budget.

Any decision to exceed the limitation for the purpose of raising revenue for capital expenditures pursuant to this subsection (1.2) shall conform with the advertising and public hearing requirements of this paragraph (c). No taxing entity may exceed the limitation to raise such revenue unless the governing board of such taxing entity has advertised its intention to do so and unless such excess has been approved by at least two-thirds of the members of such governing board voting at a public hearing. The advertisement specified in this paragraph (c) shall be in a newspaper published within the taxing entity, and, if there is no newspaper published within the taxing entity, then by publication in a newspaper published within the county which has general circulation within the taxing entity and shall appear twice therein. The second such appearance shall not be more than eight days prior to the date upon which the public hearing is to be held. The advertisement shall be no less than one-quarter page in size and shall have a caption in capital letters in a type no smaller than twenty-four-point stating "a public hearing shall be held to consider increasing your property taxes for capital expenditures". Such advertisement shall be in a type no smaller than eighteen-point and shall not be placed in that portion of the newspaper in which legal notices and classified advertisements appear. Such advertisement shall state that such board will hold a public hearing, at a time and place fixed in the advertisement, and the purpose of such hearing and shall apprise the general public of its right to attend the hearing and make comments regarding the proposed matter. Such advertisement shall also state what the property taxes would be without such excess and what the property taxes will be with such excess and the percentage difference between such property taxes. Any public hearing held pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall be open to the general public. An opportunity shall be provided for all persons to present oral testimony within such reasonable time limits as shall be set by the board conducting the hearing. Prior to the conclusion of the public hearing, the governing board of the taxing entity shall publicly announce the percent by which the mill levy required to raise such excess exceeds the mill levy computed without such excess.

(1.3) Repealed.

(1.5) All property tax revenues, except such revenues as are exempted in subsection (1) of this section, raised from any property tax levied by a taxing entity which is subject to this section, shall be combined for the purpose of determining the total amount of property tax revenue which the taxing entity is allowed to raise subject to the limitation imposed by this section. The limitation shall be applied to such aggregate property tax revenues. However, such aggregate amount shall not include any property tax revenue which is raised by or on behalf of a district, authority, or area which is within but is not comprised of the entire taxing entity and which is raised by a tax upon only property within such district, authority, or area; such property tax revenue is subject to a limitation independent of the limitation which is applied to the taxing entity within which such district, authority, or area is located. No statute establishing a set mill levy or establishing a maximum mill levy or authorizing an additional mill levy for a special purpose shall be construed as authorizing the taxing entity to exceed the limitation imposed by this section.

(1.7) For property tax years commencing on or after January 1, 1988, any taxing entity which is subject to the provisions of this section shall not levy any property tax for purposes which are exempt from the limitation imposed by subsection (1) of this section in an amount which is greater than the amount of revenues required to be raised for such purposes during any year as specified by the provisions of any contract entered into by such taxing entity or any schedule of payments established for the payment of any obligation incurred by such taxing entity. Where bonds, contractual obligations, or capital expenditures have been approved, but actual revenues required for such purposes are not known at the time the levy is set, the taxing entity may base its levy on the estimated revenues which are so required for one year only and in subsequent years the levy shall be based on the actual revenues which are so required. Nothing in this subsection (1.7) shall preclude refunding of any obligation or contract.

If an increase over said limitation is allowed by the division of local government in the department of local affairs or voted by the electors of a taxing entity under the provisions of section 29-1-302, the increased revenue resulting therefrom shall be included in determining the limitation in the following year. However, any portion of such increased revenue which is allowed as a capital expenditure pursuant to section 29-1-302 (1.5) shall not be included in determining the limitation in the following year.

The limitations of this part 3 shall apply to home rule counties unless provisions are included in the county home rule charter which are, as determined by the division of local government, equal to or more restrictive than the provisions of this part 3.

In the event of a consolidation or merger, in whole or in part, of two or more political subdivisions or taxing entities, the surviving entity or the entity assuming service responsibilities shall use a direct proportion of the combined entities' prior year property tax revenues as the base for computing the limitation in the year first succeeding such consolidation or merger.

Repealed.

Where a taxing entity exceeds the limitation imposed by subsection (1) of this section during any year, the division of local government shall order a reduction in the authorized revenue of the taxing entity for the subsequent year in an amount which offsets the excess revenues levied in the preceding year. Such order shall be preceded by notice to the taxing entity of the proposed order and an opportunity for the taxing entity to respond prior to issuance of the order.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 560, § 11.

L. 15:

p. 403, § 1.

L. 17:

p. 429, § 1.

C.L.

§ 7214.

L. 29:

p. 546, § 1.

L. 31:

p. 701 § 1.

CSA:

C. 142, § 39.

L. 52:

p. 142, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 36-3-2.

L. 55:

p. 253, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-3-1.

L. 69:

p. 1053, § 24.

L. 70:

p. 378, § 3.

L. 71:

p. 957, § 1.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 685, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(1) amended, p. 678, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 81:

(1) and (2) amended and (1.3) and (1.5) added, p. 1395, § 5, effective June 19; (1) amended, p. 1612, § 6, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(1) amended and (1.2) added, p. 1199, § 1, effective May 25; (1) amended, p. 1196, § 1, effective June 3; (1) amended, p. 2085, § 3, effective October 13.

L. 85:

(1.2)(c) amended, p. 1024, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1), (1.2)(a), (1.2)(c), (1.5), and (2) amended and (1.3) R&RE, pp. 1021, 1023, §§ 2, 3, effective May 16.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1178, § 1, effective April 16; (1.2)(a), (1.5), and (4) amended, p. 1181, § 1, effective April 30; (1.2)(c) amended, p. 1184, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 88:

(1) and (1.3) amended and (1.7) and (6) added, p. 1279, § 3, effective May 23; (1) amended, p. 1099, § 1, effective May 29; (1.3) amended and (5) added, p. 1268, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1467, § 35, effective June 7.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1704, § 39, effective June 9.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1969, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1281, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 96:

(1)(a) amended, p. 16, § 1, effective February 22.

29-1-301.1. Levies reduced - limitation - 1988. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 1020, § 1, effective January 1, 1987.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1187, § 1, effective March 12; (1) amended, p. 1179, § 2, effective April 16; (1) amended, p. 1181, § 2, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 1988. (See L. 86, p. 1020.)

29-1-302. Increased levy - submitted to people at election.

If the board of any special district authorized to levy a tax or any officer charged with the duty of levying a tax in any special district is of the opinion that the amount of tax limited by section 29-1-301 will be insufficient for the needs of such special district for the current year, the question of an increased levy may be submitted to the division of local government in the department of local affairs, and it is the duty of said division to consider the public awareness of the question, the public support therefor, and the public objection thereto and to examine the needs of such special district and ascertain from such examination the financial condition thereof, and, if in the opinion of the division such special district is in need of additional funds, the said division may grant an increased levy for such special district above the limits specified in this part 3, and such special district is authorized to make such excess levy. The division of local government shall not under any circumstance grant an increased levy based upon increased valuation for assessment purposes from reappraisals. As used in this section, "special district" means any district organized pursuant to law, except school districts operating pursuant to title 22, C.R.S., which is authorized to levy an ad valorem tax on property within its boundaries, and the term includes, but is not limited to, districts organized under article 20 of title 30, C.R.S., articles 25 and 35 of title 31, C.R.S., and titles 32 and 37, C.R.S.

(1.5) (a) The general assembly recognizes the need for periodic increased levies in order to finance capital projects and purchases of capital assets which are a one-time, nonrecurring expenditure. It is the intent of the general assembly that the division of local government may grant an increased levy for such expenditures if, in its opinion, a special district, to which section 29-1-301 (1.2)(a) does not apply, is in need of additional funds for such expenditures. Any increased levy granted by the division of local government in a given year which is designated by it as a capital expenditure shall not be included in determining the limitation in the following year. If the division is of the opinion that such additional funds will be needed for two or more years after reviewing the long-range plan of the special district concerning the expenditure of such funds, it may grant an increased levy, and such increased levy shall automatically be allowed for each year during which such additional funds will be needed. During such years, the increased levy for each year shall not be included in determining the limitation in the following year.

Repealed.

In case the division of local government, after consideration of the public awareness of the question, the public support therefor, and the public objection thereto, refuses or fails within ten days after submission to it of an adopted budget to grant an increased levy to a special district pursuant to subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section, the question may be submitted to the qualified electors of said district at a general or special election called for the purpose and in the manner provided by law for calling special elections in such special district.

Any taxing entity to which section 29-1-301 (1) applies may, at its discretion, submit the question of an increased levy directly to an election of the qualified electors without first submitting the question of an increased levy to the division of local government.

Any city or town having a population of two thousand or less, based upon the latest estimates of the department of local affairs, may utilize the provisions of subsections (1), (1.5), and (2)(a) of this section.

Due notice of submission of the question of whether to grant the increased levy shall be given as required by articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. If a majority of the votes cast at any such election is in favor of the increased levy, then the officers charged with levying taxes may make such increased levy for the year or years voted upon.

to (6) Repealed.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 560, § 12.

C.L.

§ 7216.

CSA:

C. 142, § 41.

L. 52:

p. 142, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 36-3-5.

L. 55:

p. 253, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-3-2.

L. 69:

p. 1053, § 25.

L. 70:

p. 378, § 4.

L. 71:

p. 957, § 2.

L. 72:

p. 611, § 127.

L. 76:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 685, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(3) added, p. 1748, § 21, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1388, § 1, effective May 27; (1.5) added, p. 1397, § 6, effective June 19; (6) added, p. 1390, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(1.5) amended, p. 1203, § 1, effective April 29; (1.5) R&RE, p. 1201, § 3, effective May 25; (1) amended, p. 2072, § 1, effective October 13.

L. 85:

(1.5)(b) and (3) amended, p. 1025, § 2, effective May 22; (4) repealed, p. 1363, § 26, effective June 28.

L. 86:

(1), (1.5)(a), and (2) amended and (1.5)(b), (5), and (6) repealed, pp. 1024, 1027, §§ 4, 8, effective January 1, 1987.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 1181, § 3, effective April 30; (3) amended, p. 1185, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 1187, § 82, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(2)(c) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 296, § 44, effective September 14.

29-1-303. Revenue-raising limitation exemption - public disclosure of tax levy. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1392, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 82:

(2)(b) amended, p. 457, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 83:

(2)(b) amended, p. 2073, § 2, effective October 13.

L. 85:

(1)(b) and (4) amended, p. 1026, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a), (2), and (10) amended, p. 1025, § 5, effective May 16; (9) repealed, p. 1027, § 8, effective January 1, 1987.

L. 87:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1187, § 2, effective March 12; (1)(b) and (4) amended, p. 1185, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1464, § 28, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (10) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 1990. (See L. 86, p. 1025.)

29-1-304. Funding for state-mandated programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1394, § 2, effective June 19.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1026, § 6, effective January 1, 1987.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 914, § 4, effective June 7.

29-1-304.5. State mandates - prohibition - exception.

No new state mandate or an increase in the level of service for an existing state mandate beyond the existing level of service required by law shall be mandated by the general assembly or any state agency on any local government unless the state provides additional moneys to reimburse such local government for the costs of such new state mandate or such increased level of service. In the event that such additional moneys for reimbursement are not provided, such mandate or increased level of service for an existing state mandate shall be optional on the part of the local government.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:

Any new state mandate or any increase in the level of service for an existing state mandate beyond the existing level of service which is the result of any requirement of federal law;

Any new state mandate or any increase in the level of service for an existing state mandate beyond the existing level of service which is the result of any requirement of a final state or federal court order;

Any modification in the share of school districts for financing the state public school system;

Any new state mandate or any increase in the level of service for an existing state mandate beyond the existing level or service which is the result of any state law enacted prior to the second regular session of the fifty-eighth general assembly or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder;

Any new state mandate or any increase in the level of service for an existing state mandate beyond the existing level of service which is undertaken at the option of a local government which results in additional requirements or standards; and

Any order from the state board of education pertaining to the establishment, operation, or funding of a charter school or any modification of the statutory or regulatory responsibilities of school districts pertaining to charter schools.

For purposes of this section:

"Increase in the level of service for an existing state mandate" does not include any increase in expenditures necessary to offset an increase in costs to provide such service due to inflation or any increase in the number of recipients of such service unless such increase results from any requirement of law which either enlarges an existing class of recipients or adds a new class of recipients.

"Local government" means any county, city and county, city, or town, whether home rule or statutory, or any school district, special district, authority, or other political subdivision of the state.

"Requirement of federal law" means any federal law, rule, regulation, executive order, guideline, standard, or other federal action which has the force and effect of law and which either requires the state to take action or does not directly require the state to take action but will, according to federal law, result in the loss of federal funds if state action is not taken to comply with such federal action.

"State mandate" means any legal requirement established by statutory provision or administrative rule or regulation which requires any local government to undertake a specific activity or to provide a specific service which satisfies minimum state standards, including, but not limited to:

Program mandates which result from orders or conditions specified by the state as to what activity shall be performed, the quality of the program, or the quantity of services to be provided; and

Procedural mandates which regulate and direct the behavior of any local government in providing programs or services, including, but not limited to, reporting, fiscal, personnel, planning and evaluation, record-keeping, and performance requirements.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 912, § 3, effective June 7.

L. 2004:

(2)(f) added, p. 1591, § 23, effective June 3.

29-1-304.7. Programs delegated by the general assembly - termination or reduction - requirements.

Any local government which, pursuant to section 20 (9) of article X of the state constitution, intends to reduce or terminate its subsidy to any program delegated to such local government by the general assembly for administration shall provide written notice of such intention to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairman of the joint budget committee of the general assembly, and the head of any state department or agency affected.

The notice required by this section shall contain information sufficient to identify the program and shall state whether the local government intends to reduce or terminate its subsidy to the program. If a reduction is intended, the notice shall also specify the amount of such reduction.

The notice may specify an effective date for such reduction or termination; except that in no event shall the reduction or termination take effect prior to ninety days after receipt of the notice by all of the parties named in subsection (1) of this section.

Any reduction or termination for which notice is given pursuant to this section shall take place over a three-year period in three equal annual amounts.

The director of the division of local government of the department of local affairs is authorized and empowered, after consultation with the affected departments or agencies, if any, to promulgate, adopt, amend, and repeal such rules and regulations, as may be necessary for the implementation and administration of this section.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 5, § 1, effective February 16.

29-1-304.8. Programs not delegated by the general assembly.

A local district, within the meaning of section 20 (2) of article X of the state constitution, shall not reduce or end its subsidy pursuant to section 20 (9) of said article to any program if:

The program is one of the inherent powers, duties, or functions of an officer whose office is created as a county office by the state constitution, including but not limited to the county clerk and recorder, the county sheriff, the county coroner, the county treasurer, the county surveyor, the county assessor, and the county attorney; or

The program is required by the state constitution to be administered by the local district, including but not limited to duties related to the maintenance of the state court system and the equalization of property tax assessments.

Nothing in the general assembly's enactment of a requirement that a local district contribute toward the funding of a program operated by an agency or officer which is not under the jurisdiction of that local district, including but not limited to the requirement that counties pay a portion of the costs of maintaining the office of the district attorney, shall imply that the general assembly has delegated the program to the local district for administration within the meaning of section 20 (9) of article X of the state constitution.

A board of county commissioners shall not cease exercising or performing its inherent legislative, executive, or quasi-judicial powers, duties, or functions in the guise of reducing or ending its subsidy to a program pursuant to the provisions of section 20 (9) of article X of the state constitution.

As used in this section:

"Administration" means the executive management or superintendence of public affairs, as distinguished from policy-making.

"Inherent" means in the essential character of or belonging by nature or settled habit to.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1517, § 21, effective June 6.

29-1-304.9. Fiscal note.

For any proposed legislation introduced after December 31, 2009, that may have a fiscal impact on a county, school district, or board of cooperative services, the staff of the legislative council shall consider and provide in the local government impact section of the accompanying fiscal note, when possible, taking into account reasonable time constraints, the following:

A reasonable and timely estimate of the fiscal impact on the counties, school districts, or boards of cooperative services chosen in accordance with subsection (2) of this section that would result from the proposed legislation; and

Potential staffing and other administrative aspects of the proposed legislation.

In order to compile the information required by subsection (1) of this section, the staff of the legislative council shall request from a statewide association of county commissioners or the department of education fiscal information regarding the impact of the proposed legislation on certain counties to be determined by the association, school districts, or boards of cooperative services, to be determined by the department of education.

The staff of the legislative council shall consider the information received from the association, school districts, or boards of cooperative services, if any, when completing the local government impact section of any fiscal note.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1200), ch. 163, p. 701, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1277), ch. 306, p. 1503, § 29, effective August 10.

29-1-305. Mill levy limits - temporary exceptions - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1197, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 86:

Entire section repealed, p. 1027, § 8, effective January 1, 1987.